Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1108
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1986, LB 284, § 8;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 30;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 46;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 258.